src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON s70 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** siga
           +V+Inf:%>siga    	Pass        ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>sigi 	Pass 		;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>sig      iurPass    	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>sig  	urPass    	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>sig      iurPass    	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>sig  	urPass    	;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>siga 	Pass    	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:%>segði  	Pass		;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:%>segði  	Pass		;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:%>segði    Pass		;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>søgdu   	Pass		;
 	            :%>sig    	imp_prsptc 	;
	            :%>sag    	sup        	;
	   +V+PrfPtc:%>sag	 	p8         	;

LEXICON s71 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** skerja
            	jinf       		;
          :j  	pres_ir    		;
          :  	prt_d      		;
          	 	sup      		;
          :j  	imp_prsptc_j 	;
 		  :d 	p7         		;

LEXICON s72 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** eta
          :et     inf        ;
          :et     pres_ur    ;
          :át     prt_null_s ;
          :ót     prt_u_p    ;
          :et     sup_ið_in  ;
          :et     imp_prsptc ;
 		  :et p26        ;

LEXICON s73 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** læa
          :læ   inf        			;
          :læ	pres_strong_s1 		;
          :læ   pres_strong_s23_t1  ;
          :læ   prt_ði 				;
          :ló	prt_null			;
          :læð	prt_u_p				;
          :læð  sup_ið_in      		;
          :læ   imp_prsptc 			;
		  :læin p26        			;
 

!! ## Ad hoc, irregular
! =================

LEXICON BLÍVA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:blíva    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:blívi    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:blív     urPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:blív     urPass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:blíva    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:bleiv    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:bleiv    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:bleiv    stPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:bleiv    Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:blivu    Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:blív     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:blívið   #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:blívandi VANDI ;
         +V+Sup:blívið   #  ;
               :bliv     p26  ;

LEXICON EIGA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:eiga    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eigi    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eig     urPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:eig     urPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eiga    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:átti    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:átti    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:átti    Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:áttu    Pass  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:eigandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPtc:áttur   #  ;
         +V+Sup:átt     #  ;

LEXICON EITA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:eita    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eiti    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eit     urPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eit     urPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eita    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:æt      Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:æt      Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:æt      Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:itu     Pass  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:itandi  VANDI ; ! XXX check
               :it      p26  ;
         +V+Sup:itið    #  ;

LEXICON GRÁTA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:áta    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:áti    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:æt     urPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:æt     urPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:áta    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:æt     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:æt     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ætst   #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:æt     Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ótu    Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:át     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:átið   #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:átandi VANDI ;
               :át     p26  ;
         +V+Sup:átið   #  ;

LEXICON HAVA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:hava     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:havi     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:hev      urPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:hev      urPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:hava     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:hevði    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:hevði    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:hevði    Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:høvdu    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:hav      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:havið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:havandi  VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPtc:havd     urPass ;
         +V+Sup:havt     #  ;

LEXICON KUNNA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:kunna  # ;
         +V+Inf:kunja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:kann   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kanst  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kann   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunnu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunna  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:kundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:kundi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:kundu  # ;
         +V+Sup:kunnað # ;

LEXICON MEGA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:mega  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:má    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:mást  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:má    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:mugu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:muga  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:mátti # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:mátti # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:mátti # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:máttu # ;

LEXICON MUNNA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:munna  # ;
         +V+Inf:munja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:man    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:manst  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:man    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:munnu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:munna  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:munja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:mundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:mundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:mundi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:mundu  # ;
         +V+Sup:munnað # ;

LEXICON SKULA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:skula   # ;
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:skulla  # ;
         +V+Inf:skulja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:skal    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:skalt   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:skal    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:skulu   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl+Err/Orth:skullu   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:skula   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:skulja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:skuldi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:skuldi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:skuldi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:skuldu  # ;
         +V+Sup:skulað  # ;

LEXICON TYKJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:tykja   Pass ; ! tykja, tykjast
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:tyki   rPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:tyki   rPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:tyki   rPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:tyki   rPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:tókti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:tykti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tókti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tykti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tóktist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tyktist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:tókti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:tykti   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:tóktu   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:tyktu   # ;
         +V+Sup:tykt    # ;

LEXICON VERA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:vera  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eri   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ert   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:er    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eru   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:var   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:varst # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:var   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vóru  # ;
         +V+Sup:verið # ;

LEXICON VERÐA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:verða    #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:verði    #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:verð%>ur #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:verð%>ur #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:verða    #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:varð     #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:varðst   #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:varð     #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vórðu    #   ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:verð     #   ;
     +V+Sbj+3Sg:verði    #   ; !XXX verði ljós
      +V+Imp+Pl:verðið   #   ;
      +V+PrsPrc:verðandi #   ;
               :vorð   p26 ;


LEXICON VILJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:vilja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:vil    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:vilt   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:vil    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:vilja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:vildi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:vildi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:vildi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vildu  # ;
         +V+Sup:viljað # ;

LEXICON VITA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:vita   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:veit   Pass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:veitst # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg+Err/Orth:veist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:veit   Pass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:vita   Pass ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:visti  Pass ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:visti  Pass ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:visti  Pass ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vistu  Pass ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl+Err/Orth:vitstu  Pass ;
         +V+Sup:vitað  # ;


LEXICON SÍGGJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:síggja    Pass  	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:síggi     Pass  	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:sæ        rtPass  	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:sær       #		  	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:sæ        rPass  	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:síggja    Pass  	;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:sá        Pass  	;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sást      #  		;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sá        Pass  	; 
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:sá        Pass  	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:sóu       Pass  	;
      +V+Imp+Sg:síggj     #  		;
+V+Imp+Sg+Err/Orth:sjá     #  		;
      +V+Imp+Sg:sí        #  		;
      +V+Imp+Pl:síggið    #  		;
      +V+PrsPrc:síggjandi VANDI 	;
               :sæ        p18  		;
         +V+Sup:sæð       #  		;
         +V+Sup:sætt      #  		;
