src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
mega: MEGA ;
eiga: EIGA ;
eita: EITA ;
gráta:gr GRÁTA ;
smágráta:smá#gr GRÁTA ;
hálvgráta:hálv#gr GRÁTA ;
stórgráta:stór#gr GRÁTA ;
skjálvtagráta:skjálvta#gr GRÁTA ;
síggja: SÍGGJA ;
burtursíggja:burtur# SÍGGJA ;
tykja: TYKJA ;
samtykja:sam# TYKJA ;
vilja: VILJA ;
skula: SKULA ;
kunna: KUNNA ;
munna: MUNNA ;
vera: VERA ;
vita: VITA ;
hava: HAVA ;
blíva: BLÍVA ;
verða: VERÐA ;
siga: s70 ;
uppsiga:upp# s70 ;
fullsiga:full# s70 ;
endursiga:endur# s70 ;
missiga:mis# s70 ;
mótsiga:mót# s70 ;
avsiga:av# s70 ;
hálvsiga:hálv# s70 ;
ovsiga:ov# s70 ;
skerja:sker s71 ;
knúgvaskerja:knúgva#sker s71 ;
vongskerja:vong#sker s71 ;
lamskerja:lam#sker s71 ;
beinskerja:bein#sker s71 ;
eta: s72 ;
kappeta:kapp s72 ;
stóreta:stór s72 ;
frosteta:frost s72 ;
oveta:ov# s72 ;
oyðeta:oyð s72 ;
læa: s73 ;
tómlæa:tóm# s73 ;
smálæa:smá# s73 ;
stórlæa:stór# s73 ;
spottlæa:spott# s73 ;
hálvlæa:hálv# s73 ;
háðlæa:háð# s73 ;
